California statutes. Civil Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1043, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.67.

(a) Sections 1812.64 and 1812.65 do not apply to any dance studio which requires or receives less than fifty dollars ($50) in advance payments from or on behalf of each student for dance studio lessons or other services which are to be rendered by the studio in the future and such advance payments are not required or received by the studio from each student more frequently than once every 30 days.

(b) Sections 1812.53, 1812.54, 1812.64, and 1812.65 do not apply to a dance studio which only offers instruction in ballet, modern, jazz, tap dance, or any combination
 thereof, to persons under 21 years of age pursuant to a contract for dance studio lessons that provides all of the following: (1) a total payment of less than five hundred dollars ($500), (2) that all agreed-upon lessons will be offered within four months from the date the contract is entered, and (3) that the contract may be canceled and all money paid for instruction not yet received will be refunded within 10 days of cancellation, if the dance student cancels within three days after receiving the first lesson, or if the dance student cancels at any time after moving his or her residence to a location more than 15 miles from the location of the dance studio.

(c) Sections 1812.53, 1812.54, 1812.64, and 1812.65 do not apply to any organization that has qualified for a tax exemption under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and which receives a direct grant of funds from the California Arts Council.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1043, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.68.

If any provision of this title or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held unconstitutional, the remainder of the title and the application of such provision to other persons and circumstances shall not be affected thereby.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1571.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.69.

(a) The Secretary of State shall enforce the provisions of this title that govern the filing and maintenance of bonds.

(b) The Secretary of State shall charge a filing fee not to exceed the cost of filing the bond.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 1024, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 2.5. CONTRACTS FOR HEALTH STUDIO SERVICES [1812.80. - 1812.98.]

1812.80.

(a) The Legislature finds that the health studio industry has a significant impact upon the economy and well-being of this state and its local communities; and that the provisions of this title relating to contracts for health studio services are necessary for the public welfare.

(b) The Legislature declares that the purpose of this title is to safeguard the public against fraud, deceit, imposition and financial hardship, and to foster and encourage competition, fair
 dealing, and prosperity in the field of health studio services by prohibiting or restricting false or misleading advertising, onerous contract terms, harmful financial practices, and other unfair, dishonest, deceptive, destructive, unscrupulous, fraudulent, and discriminatory practices by which the public has been injured in connection with contracts for health studio services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 439, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.81.

As used in this title, “contract for health studio services” means a contract for instruction, training or assistance in physical culture, body building, exercising, reducing, figure development, or any other such physical skill, or for the use by an individual patron of the facilities of a health studio, gymnasium or other facility used for any of the above purposes, or for membership in any group, club, association or organization formed for any of the above purposes; but does not include (a) contracts for professional services rendered or furnished by a person licensed under the provisions of Division 2 (commencing with Section 500) of the Business
 and Professions Code, (b) contracts for instruction at schools operating pursuant to the provisions of the Education Code, or (c) contracts for instruction, training, or assistance relating to diet or control of eating habits not involving physical culture, body building, exercising, figure development, or any other such physical skill.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 690, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.82.

Every contract for health studio services shall be in writing and shall be subject to the provisions of this title. A copy of the written contract shall be physically given to or delivered by email to the customer at the time he or she signs the contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 189, Sec. 1.   (AB 2810)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.83.

All contracts for health studio services, which may be in effect between the same seller and the same buyer, the terms of which overlap for any period, shall be considered as one contract for the purposes of this title.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1571.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.84.

(a) A contract for health studio services may not require payments or financing by the buyer to exceed the term of the contract, nor may the term of the contract exceed three years. This subdivision does not apply to a member’s obligation to pay valid, outstanding moneys due under the contract, including moneys to be paid pursuant to a termination notice period in the contract in which the termination
 notice period does not exceed 30 days.

(b) A contract for health studio services shall include a statement printed in a size at least 14-point type or presented in an equally legible electronic format that discloses the initial or minimum length of the term of the contract. This statement shall be placed above the space reserved for the signature of the buyer.

(c) At any time a cancellation is authorized by this title, a contract for health studio services may be canceled by the buyer in person, via email from an email address on file with the health studio, or via first-class mail.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 189, Sec. 2.   (AB 2810)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.85.

(a) Every contract for health studio services shall provide that performance of the agreed-upon services will begin within six months after the date the contract is entered into. The consumer may cancel the contract and receive a pro rata refund if the health studio fails to provide the specific facilities advertised or offered in writing by the time indicated. If no time is indicated in the contract,
 the consumer may cancel the contract within six months after the execution of the contract and shall receive a pro rata refund. If a health studio fails to meet a timeline set forth in this section, the consumer may cancel the contract at any time after the expiration of the timeline. However, if following the expiration of the timeline, the health studio provides the advertised or agreed-upon services, the consumer may cancel the contract up to 10 days after those services are provided.

(b) (1) Every contract for health studio services shall, in addition, contain on its face, and in close proximity to the space reserved for the signature of the buyer, a conspicuous statement in a size equal to at least 10-point boldface type, as follows:

“You, the buyer, may choose to cancel this agreement at any time prior to midnight of the fifth business day of the health studio after the
 date of this agreement, excluding Sundays and holidays. To cancel this agreement, mail, email, or deliver a signed and dated notice that states that you, the buyer, are canceling this agreement, or words of similar effect. The notice shall be sent via first-class mail, via email from an email address on file with the health studio, or delivered in person to(Name of health studio operator)at (Address and email address of health studio operator).”(2) The contract for health studio services shall contain on the first page, in a type size no smaller than that generally used in the body of the document, the following: (A) the name and mailing address of the health studio operator to which the notice of cancellation is to be mailed, (B) the email address of the health studio operator to which a notice of cancellation email is to be sent, and (C) the date the buyer signed the contract.

(3) The contract shall provide a description of the services, facilities, and hours of access to which the consumer is entitled or state where that information is available on the health studio operator’s Internet Web site. Any services, facilities, and hours of access that are not described in the contract or on the health studio operator’s Internet Web site shall be
 considered optional services, and these optional services shall be considered as separate contracts for the purposes of this title and Section 1812.83.

(4) Until the health studio operator has complied with this section, the buyer may cancel the contract for health studio services.

(5) All moneys paid pursuant to a contract for health studio services shall be refunded within 10 days after receipt of the notice of cancellation, except that payment shall be made for any health studio services received prior to cancellation.

(c) If at any time during the term of the contract, including a transfer of the contractual obligation, the health studio eliminates or substantially reduces the scope of the facilities, such as swimming pools or tennis courts, that were described in the contract, in an advertisement relating to the
 specific location, or in a written offer, and available to the consumer upon execution of the contract, the consumer may cancel the contract and receive a pro rata refund. The consumer may not cancel the contract pursuant to this subdivision if the health studio, after giving reasonable notice to its members, temporarily takes facilities out of operation for reasonable repairs, modifications, substitutions, or improvements. This subdivision shall not be interpreted to give the consumer the right to cancel a contract because of changes to the type or quantity of classes or equipment offered, provided the consumer is informed in the contract that the health studio reserves the right to make changes to the type or quantity of classes or equipment offered and the changes to the type or quantity of classes or equipment offered are reasonable under the circumstances.

(d) (1) If a contract for health studio services requires
 payment of one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) to two thousand dollars ($2,000), inclusive, including initiation fees or initial membership fees, by the person receiving the services or the use of the facility, the person shall have the right to cancel the contract within 20 days after the contract is executed.

(2) If a contract for health studio services requires payment of two thousand one dollars ($2,001) to two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), inclusive, including initiation fees or initial membership fees, by the person receiving the services or the use of the facility, the person shall have the right to cancel the contract within 30 days after the contract is executed.

(3) If a contract for health studio services requires payment of two thousand five hundred one dollars ($2,501) or more, including initiation fees or initial membership fees, by the person
 receiving the services or the use of the facility, the person shall have the right to cancel the contract within 45 days after the contract is executed.

(4) The right of cancellation provided in this subdivision shall be set out in the membership contract.

(5) The rights and remedies under this paragraph are cumulative to any rights and remedies under other law.

(6) A health studio entering into a contract for health studio services that requires a payment of less than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500), including initiation or initial membership fees and exclusive of interest or finance charges, by the person receiving the services or the use of the facilities, is not required to comply with paragraph (1), (2), or (3).

(e) Upon cancellation,
 the consumer shall be liable only for that portion of the total contract payment, including initiation fees and other charges however denominated, that has been available for use by the consumer, based upon a pro rata calculation over the term of the contract. The remaining portion of the contract payment shall be returned to the consumer by the health studio.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 189, Sec. 3.   (AB 2810)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.86.

(a) No contract for health studio services shall require payment by the person receiving the services or the use of the facilities of a total amount in excess of the amount specified in subdivision (b) or (c).

(b) The limit specified in subdivision (a) shall, on and after January 1, 2006, be three thousand dollars ($3,000), inclusive of initiation or initial membership fees and exclusive of interest or finance charges.

(c) The limit in subdivision (a) shall, on and after January 1, 2010, be four thousand four hundred dollars ($4,400), inclusive of initiation or initial membership fees and exclusive of interest or finance charges.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 439, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.87.

No contract for health studio services shall require or entail the execution of any note or series of notes by the buyer which when separately negotiated will cut off as to third parties any right of action or defense which the buyer may have against the seller.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1571.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.88.

No right of action or defense arising out of a contract for health studio services which the buyer has against the seller, and which would be cut off by assignment, shall be cut off by assignment of the contract to any third party whether or not he acquires the contract in good faith and for value unless the assignee gives notice of the assignment to the buyer as provided in this section and within 30 days of the mailing of notice receives no written notice of the facts giving rise to the claim or defense of the buyer. A notice of assignment shall be in writing addressed to the buyer at the address shown on the contract and shall identify the contract and inform the
 buyer that he must, within 30 days of the date of mailing of the notice, notify the assignee in writing of any facts giving rise to a claim or defense which he may have. The notice of assignment shall state the name of the seller and buyer, a description of the services, the contract balance and the number and amount of the installments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1571.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.89.

(a) (1) Every contract for health studio services shall contain a clause providing that if, by reason of death or disability, the person agreeing to receive services is unable to receive all services for which he has contracted, he and his estate shall be relieved from the obligation of making payment for services other than those received prior to death or the onset of disability, and that if he has prepaid any sum for services, so much of such sum as is allocable to services he has not taken shall be promptly refunded to him or his representative.

(2) In every case in which a person has prepaid a sum for services under a contract for health studio services, and by reason of death or disability, is unable to receive all such services, the party agreeing to furnish such services shall, on request, immediately refund to such person or his personal representative such amount of the sum prepaid as is proportionate to the amount of services not received.

(3) For the purposes of this section, “disability” means a condition which precludes the buyer from physically using the facilities and the condition is verified by a physician.

(4) Notwithstanding the provisions of any contract to the contrary, whenever the contract price is payable in installments and the buyer is relieved from making further payments or entitled to a refund under this section, the amount of the contract price allocable to services not received
 shall represent at least as great a proportion of the total contract price as the sum of the periodic monthly balances not yet due bears to the sum of all the periodic monthly balances under the schedule of installments in the contract.

(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), every contract for health studio services shall contain a clause providing that if the person agreeing to receive health studio services moves further than 25 miles from the health studio and is unable to transfer the contract to a comparable facility, such person shall be relieved from the obligation of making payment for services other than those received prior to the move, and if such person has prepaid any sum for health studio services, so much of such sum as is allocable to services he or she has not taken shall be promptly refunded.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a
 contract for health studio services may contain a clause providing that if the person agreeing to receive health studio services moves further than 25 miles from the health studio and is unable to transfer the contract to a comparable facility, such person may be charged a predetermined fee not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100), or, if more than half the life of the contract has expired, such person may be charged a predetermined fee not exceeding fifty dollars ($50).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 651, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.90.

The provisions of this title are not exclusive and do not relieve the parties or the contracts subject thereto from compliance with all other applicable provisions of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1675.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.91.

Any contract for health studio services which does not comply with the applicable provisions of this title shall be void and unenforceable as contrary to public policy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1571.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.92.

Any contract for health studio services entered into in reliance upon any willful and false, fraudulent, or misleading information, representation, notice or advertisement of the seller shall be void and unenforceable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1571.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.93.

Any waiver of the buyer of the provisions of this title shall be deemed contrary to public policy and shall be void and unenforceable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1675.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.94.

(a) Any buyer injured by a violation of this title may bring an action for the recovery of damages. Judgment may be entered for three times the amount at which the actual damages are assessed plus reasonable attorney fees.

(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of this title, any failure to comply with any provision of this title may be corrected within 30 days after the execution of the contract by the buyer, and, if so corrected, neither the seller nor the holder shall be subject to any penalty under this title, provided that any correction which increases any monthly payment, the
 number of payments, or the total amount due, must be concurred in, in writing, by the buyer. “Holder” includes the seller who acquires the contract or, if the contract is purchased by a financing agency or other assignee, the financing agency or other assignee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.95.

If any provision of this title or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held unconstitutional, the remainder of the title and the application of such provision to other persons and circumstances shall not be affected thereby.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1675.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.96.

(a)Except as provided in subdivision (c) or (d), all money received by the seller of health studio services from a consumer for a health studio facility that has not yet opened for business shall be held in trust and shall be deposited in a trust account established in a state or federally chartered bank or savings association. The seller shall not draw, transfer, or encumber any of the money held in trust until five business days after the health studio facility has opened and the seller has fully paid refunds to consumers who canceled
 their contracts as provided in subdivision (b) or in Section 1812.85.

(b) In addition to any other cancellation rights, a consumer who pays any money under a contract for health studio services for a health studio facility that has not yet opened for business has the right to cancel the contract and receive a full refund at any time prior to midnight of the fifth business day after the date the health studio opens for business. The cancellation right shall be set forth in the contract. The refund shall be paid within 10 days of receipt of notice of cancellation.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a seller of health studio services may draw on money held in trust to pay refunds or may draw, transfer, or encumber funds to the extent that the amount is offset by a bond of equal or greater amount that satisfies this subdivision. The bond shall be issued by a surety insurer admitted
 to do business in this state and shall be filed with the Secretary of State. The bond shall be in favor of the State of California for the benefit of consumers harmed by a violation of this title.

(d) Subdivision (a) does not apply to a seller of health studio services that is, at the time money is received from the consumer, operating at least five health studio facilities in this state that have been in operation for a period of at least five years, and that has an excess of current assets over current liabilities of at least one million dollars ($1,000,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 439, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.98.

Nothing in this title is intended to prohibit month-to-month contracts. This section is declaratory of existing law.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 1812.97 (as added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 439) by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Note: Section 1812.97 is in Title 2.55, which follows this section.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 2.55. CONTRACTS FOR THE LEASE OR RENTAL OF ATHLETIC FACILITIES [1812.97. - 1812.97.]

1812.97.

(a) Every contract which has as its purpose the lease or rental of athletic facilities for instruction, training, or assistance in physical culture, body building, exercising, reducing, figure development, or any other related physical skill, or for baseball, football, tennis, basketball, gymnastics, track and field, hockey, ice skating, weightlifting, wrestling, or bicycling shall contain the following warning statement
 in 10-point bold type: 

Warning: Use of steroids to increase strength or growth can cause serious health problems. Steroids can keep teenagers from growing to their full height; they can also cause heart disease, stroke, and damaged liver function. Men and women using steriods may develop fertility problems, personality changes, and acne. Men can also experience premature balding and development of breast tissue. These health hazards are in addition to the civil and criminal penalties for unauthorized sale, use, or exchange of anabolic steroids. 

(b) Commencing June 1, 1990, the warning statement required pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be conspicuously posted in all athletic facilities in this state which have locker rooms. At least one warning statement shall be posted in every locker room of the athletic facility.

(c) As used in this section, “athletic facilities” includes a health studio regulated pursuant to Title 2.5 (commencing with Section 1812.80), a professional boxers’ training gymnasium, as defined in Section 18685 of the Business and Professions Code, any privately owned sports facility or stadium in this state which is open to the general public, and any publicly owned sports facility or stadium in this state, including facilities in institutions of higher learning and schools that include any or all grades 7 to 12, inclusive.

(d) As used in this section, “anabolic steroids” include, but are not limited to, the following:

(1) Dianabol (methandrostenelone).

(2) Winstrol (stabozalol).

(3) Maxibolin (ethyl estrenol).

(4) Durabolin (nandrolone phenpropionate).

(5) Deca-Durabolin (nandrolone decanote).

(6) Testosterone propionate.

(7) Pregnyl (chorionic gonadotropin).

(8) Anavar (toxandroprione).

(e) When an athletic facility seeks to renew an operating license, if it can be demonstrated by a preponderance of the evidence that an athletic facility has not posted the sign required pursuant to this section, the licensing agency may impose a fine in the amount of fifty dollars ($50) per day for each day that the violation occurred, as a condition of obtaining the license renewal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 807, Sec. 2.   Operative June 1, 1990, by Sec. 8 of Ch. 807.   Note: Section 1812.98 is in Title 2.5, preceding the heading of Title 2.55.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 2.6. CONTRACTS FOR DISCOUNT BUYING SERVICES [1812.100. - 1812.129.]

1812.100.

(a) The Legislature finds that there exists in connection with a substantial number of contracts for discount buying services, sales practices and business and financing practices which result in fraud, deceit, and financial hardships being perpetrated on the people of the state; that existing legal remedies are inadequate to correct these abuses; that the discount buying industry has a significant impact upon the economy and well-being of this state and its local communities; and that the provisions of this title relating to such contracts are necessary for the public welfare.

(b) The
 purpose of this title is to safeguard the public against fraud, deceit, and financial hardship, and to foster and encourage competition, fair dealing, and prosperity in the field of discount buying services by prohibiting or restricting false or misleading advertising, unfair contract terms, harmful financial practices, and other unfair, deceptive, destructive, unscrupulous, fraudulent and discriminatory practices by which the public has been endangered and by which the public may in the future be harmed in connection with contracts for discount buying services. This title shall be construed liberally in order to achieve the foregoing purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 237.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.101.

For the purpose of this title, the following definitions shall be used:

(a) “Discount buying organization” means any person or persons, corporation, unincorporated association, or other organization which, for a consideration, provides or purports to provide its clients or the clients or members of any other discount buying organization with the ability to purchase goods or services at discount prices, except that a discount buying organization does not include any of the following:

(1) Any discount buying organization in which the total consideration paid by each client or member in any manner whatsoever for the purchase of discount buying services from the organization that either:

(A) Does not exceed a one-time fee of fifty dollars ($50) or an annual fee of twenty-five dollars ($25) to be paid on a yearly basis.

(B) Does not exceed a one-time or annual fee of fifty dollars ($50) and the organization provides a majority of the goods and services through purchases by members who walk in to a fixed location operated by the organization.

(2) Any discount buying organization in which the total consideration paid by each client or member in any manner whatsoever for the purchase of discount buying services from the organization does not
 exceed a one-time or annual fee of one hundred dollars ($100) and the organization does all of the following in subparagraphs (A) to (F), inclusive, and subject to subparagraph (G):

(A) Offers buying services to clients or members through toll-free telephone access, computer access, or video shopping terminals.

(B) (i) During the first year of membership of each member, upon the request of the member, provides a full refund of membership fees, exclusive of any fees, however designated, not exceeding ten dollars ($10) in the aggregate, without conditions other than the surrender or destruction of materials which allow the member to access or use the service.

(ii) (I) The organization shall establish an escrow account of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for the purpose of
 providing refunds to members, pursuant to clause (i). If the fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) deposited in escrow is depleted during the first year of the existence of the escrow account, the organization shall within three business days of depletion replenish the account in the amount of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000). For each calendar year thereafter, the organization shall deposit in the account an amount equal to refunds made from the account in the prior calendar year, but not less than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000). At any time the balance in the escrow account decreases to 50 percent of the amount funded that year, the organization shall within three business days replenish the account back to the balance required at the beginning of that calendar year. The organization shall provide proof of the establishment of the escrow account to the Secretary of State and shall maintain records of all member requests for refunds and refunds made pursuant to this clause. The records shall be made available
 for review upon request by the Attorney General, any district attorney, or the Department of Justice.

(II) The escrow account shall be established and maintained at a federally insured bank or federally insured financial institution independent of the organization with escrow instructions making the bank or financial institution or an officer or employee thereof the escrow trustee.

(III) Refunds shall be made from the escrow account to any member who provides proof of membership while a California resident and requests, in writing, a membership refund, and has not previously been refunded his or her membership fee. The escrow trustee shall issue the refund within 10 days of the date the written request is received by the escrow trustee. In addition, requests for refunds may be made directly to and paid directly by the organization.

(IV) Proof of creation of the escrow account, and membership refund information, shall be provided to the members in the following form:

“The ____ (organization) has established an escrow account for the refund of membership fees at ____ (financial institution). Refunds from the escrow account may, in addition to other remedies and sources available to you, be obtained by mailing a written request along with proof of membership to ____ (escrow trustee). This refund request shall not affect or limit any other remedy at law available to you.”

(C) Provides at least 15 toll-free service lines to California consumers devoted exclusively to customer service questions and complaints.

(D) Maintains a bond which meets the requirements of Sections 1812.103 and 1812.104, except that the
 principal sum of the bond need only be twenty thousand dollars ($20,000).

(E) (i) Possesses an unrevoked acknowledgment from the Attorney General that the organization has provided to the Attorney General, to the Attorney General’s reasonable satisfaction, marketing procedures and documents that clearly explain membership fee cancellation and refund terms which include:

(I) The amount of the initial membership fee and how and when it will be collected.

(II) If applicable, that a member must be advised, before any charges are applied, that they need not provide billing information in order to be charged a membership fee, in circumstances in which the telemarketing firm has prior access to the member’s billing information.

(III) In
 the case of trial membership offers, the duration of the trial period and that if the member does not cancel within the trial period he or she will automatically be charged the membership fee.

(IV) Specifically how the member may cancel membership.

(V) The written disclosure, printed in capital letters with a minimum 14-point boldface type, indicating who to contact, both directly through the company and through the escrow account, for a refund.

(VI) The written disclosure made at the time of solicitation and at the time an enrollment package is sent to consumers.

(ii) When an organization provides documentation that clearly explains membership fee cancellation and refund terms to the Attorney General’s reasonable satisfaction, which includes the
 information required by subclauses (I) to (VI), inclusive, of clause (i) of subparagraph (E), the Attorney General shall issue a revocable acknowledgment to the organization for it to obtain this exception. The acknowledgment issued by the Attorney General is not evidence of the adequacy or accuracy of the organization’s actual disclosures and representations provided to consumers. No organization in any marketing to consumers may make any reference to an acknowledgment issued by the Attorney General under this clause.

(F) Provides the disclosures listed in subclauses (I) to (VI), inclusive, of clause (i) of subparagraph (E) to every prospective member.

(G) The exemption is null and void if the organization fails to comply with the conditions set forth in this section or if the Attorney General’s office revokes the exemption due to a organization not being in full compliance with
 all of the provisions of this section.

(3) Any discount buying organization in which persons receive discount buying services incidentally as part of a package of services provided to or available to the individual on account of his or her membership in the organization, which is not organized for the profit of any person or organization, and which does not have as one of its primary purposes or businesses, the provision of discount buying services.

(4) Any person, corporation, unincorporated association, or other organization, which, for a consideration collected from another entity, provides or purports to provide the clients of the other entity with the ability to purchase goods or services at discount prices, if the clients of the other entity do not order from, or pay any money to, that person, corporation, unincorporated association, or other organization; however, the
 entity, from which the customer purchases the right to obtain goods or services at discount prices, shall comply with the requirements of this title.

(b) “Contract for discount buying services” means a contract between one party (hereinafter referred to as the “buyer”) who is purchasing the service for personal or family use, and a discount buying organization, whereby the buyer for a consideration receives the right to obtain goods or services from the discount buying organization, or to utilize the discount buying organization services in obtaining goods and services, at discount prices.

(c) “Discount prices” means prices which are represented to be lower on most or all offered goods or services than those generally charged for the items in the locality in which the representation is made.

This definition is not intended to affect the
 degree of savings which must be offered on an item or selection of items in order to truthfully and without misleading consumers represent an item, selection of items, or entire store as being “discount” or “discounted.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 178, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.103.

Every discount buying organization shall maintain a bond issued by a surety company admitted to do business in this state. The principal sum of the bond shall be twenty thousand dollars ($20,000). A copy of such bond shall be filed with the Secretary of State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 633, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.104.

The bond required by Section 1812.103 shall be in favor of the State of California for the benefit of any person who is damaged by any violation of this title or by fraud or dishonesty or failure to provide the services of the discount buying organization in performance of the contract. The surety shall be liable only for the actual damages plus restitution and not the treble damages permitted under subdivision (a) of Section 1812.123.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.105.

(a) When a deposit has been made in lieu of a bond pursuant to Section 995.710 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the person asserting a claim against the deposit shall, in lieu of Section 996.430 of the Code of Civil Procedure, establish the claim by furnishing evidence to the Secretary of State of a money judgment entered by a court together with evidence that the claimant is a person described in Section 1812.104.

(b) When a person has established the claim with the
 Secretary of State, the Secretary of State shall review and approve the claim and enter the date of approval on the claim. The claim shall be designated an “approved claim.”

(c) When the first claim against a particular deposit has been approved, it shall not be paid until the expiration of a period of 240 days after the date of its approval by the Secretary of State. Subsequent claims that are approved by the Secretary of State within the same 240-day period shall similarly not be paid until the expiration of the 240-day period. Upon the expiration of the 240-day period, the Secretary of State shall pay all approved claims from that 240-day period in full unless the deposit is insufficient, in which case each approved claim shall be paid a pro rata share of the deposit.

(d) When the Secretary of State approves the first claim against a particular deposit after the expiration of a
 240-day period, the date of approval of that claim shall begin a new 240-day period to which subdivision (c) shall apply with respect to the amount remaining in the deposit.

(e) After a deposit is exhausted, no further claims shall be paid by the Secretary of State. Claimants who have had their claims paid in full or in part pursuant to subdivisions (c) and (d) shall not be required to return funds received from the deposit for the benefit of other claimants.

(f) When a deposit has been made in lieu of a bond, the amount of the deposit shall not be subject to attachment, garnishment, or execution with respect to an action or judgment against the discount buying organization, other than as to an amount as no longer needed or required for the purpose of this title that would otherwise be returned to the discount buying organization by the Secretary of State.
